Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.483

Opioid abatement settlement account.

(1) The opioid abatement settlement account is created in the state treasury. All settlement receipts and moneys that are designated to be used by the state of Washington to abate the opioid epidemic for state use must be deposited into the account. Money in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may only be used for future opioid remediation as provided in the applicable settlement. For purposes of this account, "opioid remediation" means the care, treatment, and other programs and expenditures, designed to: (a) Address the use and abuse of opioid products; (b) treat or mitigate opioid use or related disorders; or (c) mitigate other alleged effects of, including those injured as a result of, the opioid epidemic.

(2) All money remaining in the state opioid settlement account established under RCW 43.88.195 must be transferred to the opioid abatement settlement account created in this section.

(3) Beginning July 1, 2025, and each fiscal year thereafter through June 30, 2031, the state treasurer shall transfer into the tribal opioid prevention and treatment account created in RCW 43.79.484 from the opioid abatement settlement account an amount equal to the greater of $7,750,000 or 20 percent of the settlement receipts and moneys deposited into the opioid abatement settlement account during the prior fiscal year.

(4) Beginning July 1, 2031, and each fiscal year thereafter, the state treasurer shall transfer into the tribal opioid prevention and treatment account created in RCW 43.79.484 from the opioid abatement settlement account an amount equal to 20 percent of the settlement receipts and moneys deposited into the opioid abatement settlement account during the prior fiscal year.

(5) No transfer shall be required if the average amount of revenue received by the account per fiscal year over the prior two fiscal years is less than $7,750,000.

[ 2024 c 210 s 2; 2023 c 435 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Findings—Intent—2024 c 210: See notes following RCW 43.79.484.

Effective date—2023 c 435: See note following RCW 43.79.570.